Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.015

Display of national and state flags.

The flag of the United States and the flag of the state shall be prominently installed, displayed and maintained in schools, court rooms and state buildings.

[ 1955 c 88 s 1.]

NOTES:

Crimes relating to flags: Chapter 9.86 RCW.

Flag exercises in schools: RCW 28A.230.140.